test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ANG_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
     chíigang+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: chíigang
     chíigang+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: chíigangga
     chíigang+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang
     chíigang+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíiganggang
     chíigang+V+DIRECT+PAST: chíiganggan
     chíigang+V+RELATIVE: chíigangs
     chíigang+V+NON_FACTIVE: chíigangang
     chíigang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: chíiganggang
     chíigang+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: chíigangganggang
     chíigang+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: chíiganggangang
     chíigang+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: chíiganggiinii
     chíigang+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: chíiganggaangaa
     chíigang+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: chíiganggaangaan
     chíigang+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: chíigangäsaa
     chíigang+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: chíigangäs
     chíigang+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: chíigangäsaang
     chíigang+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: chíigangäsga
     chíigang+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: chíigangäsaas
     chíigang+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: chíigangäsaa.ang
     chíigang+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: chíigangang k̲asa'áa
     chíigang+V+NEAR+FUTURE: chíigangang k̲asa'áang
     chíigang+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: chíigangang k̲asaasdláa
     chíigang+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: chíigangang k̲asaasdláang
     chíigang+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: chíigang'uuj
     chíigang+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'uujang
     chíigang+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: chíigangäsaa'uujang
     chíigang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: chíigang'us
     chíigang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: chíigang'ujaa
     chíigang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'uujaangaa
     chíigang+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: chíigangäsaa'us
     chíigang+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: chíigangäsaa'ahlans
     chíigang+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: chíigangäseehl
     chíigang+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: chíigang'uu
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: chíigang'waa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'waa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'waang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: chíigang'wägan
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: chíigang'aawaa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: chíigang'aawaan
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: chíigang'waas
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: chíigang'aawaas
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'waa.ang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'aawaa.ang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: chíiganggang'waa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: chíiganggang'waang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: chíiganggang'waa.ang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'wägiinii
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'wägaangaa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'wägaangaan
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: chíigang'waaäsaa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: chíigang'waaäs
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: chíigang'waaäsaang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: chíigang'waaäsga
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: chíigang'waaäsaas
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'waaäsaa.ang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: chíigang'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: chíigang'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: chíigang'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: chíigang'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: chíigang'waa'uuj
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'waa'uujang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: chíigang'waaäsaa'uujang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: chíigang'waa'us
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: chíigang'waa'ujaa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'waa'uujaangaa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: chíigang'waaäsaa'us
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: chíigang'waa'ahlanggang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: chíigang'waa'ahlanggan
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: chíigang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: chíigang'waa'ahlans
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: chíigang'aawaa'ahlang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: chíigang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: chíigang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: chíigang'waa'ahl
     chíigang+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: chíigang'waaäseehl
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: chíigang'ang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: chíigang'angga
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'anggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: chíigang'anggan
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: chíigang'aangaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: chíigang'aangaan
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: chíigang'ans
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: chíigang'aangaas
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'angang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'aangaa.ang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: chíigang'anggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: chíiganggang'anggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: chíiganggang'angang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'anggiinii
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'anggaangaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'anggaangaan
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: chíigang'angäsaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: chíigang'angäs
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: chíigang'angäsaang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: chíigang'angäsga
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: chíigang'angäsaas
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'angäsaa.ang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: chíigangang k̲asaa'áng
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: chíigangang k̲asaa'ánggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: chíigangang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: chíigangang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'uuj
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'uujang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: chíigang'angäsaa'uujang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'us
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: chíigang'ang'ujaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'ang'uujaangaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: chíigang'angäsaa'us
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: chíigang'aang'ahlanggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: chíigang'aang'ahlanggan
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'aang'ahlanggiinii
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: chíigang'angäsaa'ahlans
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: chíigang'aang'ahlans
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: chíigang'aangaa'ahlang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: chíigang'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: chíigang'aangaa'ahlanggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: chíigang'aang'ahl
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: chíigang'angäseehl
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: chíigang'ang'uu
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'waa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'waa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'waang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: chíigang'ang'wägan
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: chíigang'ang'aawaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: chíigang'ang'aawaan
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: chíigang'ang'waas
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: chíigang'ang'aawaas
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'ang'waa.ang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'ang'aawaa.ang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: chíiganggang'ang'waa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: chíiganggang'ang'waang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: chíiganggang'ang'waa.ang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'ang'wägiinii
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'ang'wägaangaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'ang'wägaangaan
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: chíigang'ang'waaäsaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: chíigang'ang'waaäs
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: chíigang'ang'waaäsaang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: chíigang'ang'waaäsga
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: chíigang'ang'waaäsaas
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: chíigang'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: chíigang'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: chíigang'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: chíigang'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: chíigang'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'waa'uuj
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'waa'uujang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: chíigang'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'waa'us
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: chíigang'ang'waa'ujaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: chíigang'ang'waaäsaa'us
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: chíigang'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: chíigang'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: chíigang'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: chíigang'ang'waa'ahlans
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: chíigang'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: chíigang'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: chíigang'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: chíigang'ang'waa'ahl
     chíigang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: chíigang'ang'waaäseehl
